runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
авіатаксист/2:%{
автоміст/0xz
авторитет/2%:{
автоцементовіз/0xz
адмінреформатор/2:%{
аероміст/0xz
Акім/2:{
алгебраїзуватися/Z|w
альбатрос/2:%{
амфітріон/2:%{
Антал/2:{
ануїтент/2:%{
армадил/2:%{
Артищів/3@}
арт-простір/0z
ас/2:%{
аспектуватися/Z|w
аудіовхід/0z
аудіопростір/0z
Аурел/2:{
базарянин/2:8{
бандажист/2:%{
Батиїв/m3@}
батрачити/Z|wL
батяр/5$)K2:%{
Бежів/3@}
белькотун/2:%{
бензинопровід/0z
Бердичів/3@}
Бертишів/3@}
Бєлгород/2:{
бізнес-захід/0z
Білашів/3@}
біло-сині/~
біль/0zE
біоархітектор/2:%{
блискіт/0z
бовтун/2:%{
Бовшів/3@}
богохульствувати/Z|w
Бодячів/3@}
Болячів/3@}
борозняк/2:%{
Бортнів/3@}
Борщів/3@}
Бред/2:{
Брошнів/3@}
будзагін/0z
Буймер/2:{
буйнувати/Z|
Булдичів/3@}
Буців/3@}
Бхубанешвар/2:{
вагонопотік/0z
Ванів/3@}
Вардкес/2:{
вартувати/Z|w
вбір/0z
вдивлятися/[|Q
Велеснів/3@}
великоросіянин/2:8{
верболіз/0z
Вертер/2:{
Верхнів/3@}
взаємоконтролювати/Z|w
взаємоперехід/0z
вивід/0xz
вивідуватися/Z|w
видзвін/0z
видихати/[|Q
виклопотувати/Z|w(
вилучувати/Z|w(
Вимушів/3@}
винахід/0z
випаровуватися/Z|w
випрямлюватися/Z|w
виріст/0z
висловлювати/Z|w(
витвір/0z
витікати/[|Q
вихрещуватися/Z|w
Виців/3@}
Вищеольчедаїв/3@}
вібропривід/0z
від'єднувати/Z|w(
відвід/0z
віддзвін/0z
віддиматися/[|Q
відеобізнесмен/2:%{
відеопотік/0z
відлежувати/Z|w
відплачувати/Z|w
відслужувати/Z|w
відстій/0z
відхрещувати/Z|w
віл/0xz7
Вінсент/2:%{
віцеректор/2:%{
вкапувати/Z|w
вкіс/0z
вмиротворюватися/Z|w
Вовкошів/3@}
водогін/0z
водопровід/0z
волопас/2:%{
Вороніж/3@}
Вороців/3@}
восьминіг/0xz7
впарювати/Z|w(
вряджати/[|Q
втлумачувати/Z|w(
вурдалак/2:%{
газовід/0z
газопаропровід/0z
газохід/0z
газуватися/Z|w
галлофоб/2:%{
Ґастон/2:{
Гемпшир/2{
Герт/2:{
гетероперехід/0z
гехкати/[|Q
гіперперехід/0z
гіпокрит/2:%{
Гланишів/3@}
гній/0z
Гоголів/S3@}
Голишів/3@}
Голіаф/2:%{
гомін/0z
гомогенізуватися/Z|w
Горбулів/3@}
горлопан/2:%{
гострокіл/0z
Гошів/3@}
Григол/2:{
Грицаїв/3@}
грім/0z
Грушів/3@}
губернаторствувати/Z|w
Гузіїв/3@}
гунтер/2:%{
Гур'їв/3@}
Данкан/2:{
Дашів/3@}
двір/0xz
дезорієнтовувати/Z|w
декан/2:%{
департизувати/Z|wO
держінспектор/2:%{
держнабір/0z
Дернів/3@}
джеркотун/2:%{
дзюркотати/Z|w
дизель-електрохід/0xz
Дирчин/2:{
дисковід/0z
діл/0z
добір/0z
добризкувати/Z|w
Доброслав/2:%{
договір/0z
дозбируватися/Z|w
документопотік/0z
Домашів/3@}
домітати/[|Q
дорисовуватися/Z|w
Дорошів/S3@}
дотоплювати/Z|w(
дохід/0z
драгоман/2:%{
дріт/0z
Дробишів/3@}
дублювати/Z|wO
Дюльгер/2:{
еквілібрист/2:%{
екс-гітарист/2:%{
експонент/2:%{
електорат/2%{
електровинахід/0z
електроміст/0xz
електропристрій/0z
енергоавдитор/2:%{
енергоострів/0xz
ескроу-агент/2:%{
етикетуватися/Z|w
єврогість/0xz
єврократ/2:%{
Єфрон/2:{
Жежелів/3@}
Живачів/3@}
живопліт/0z
жовтяк/2:%{
Жовчів/3@}
заанкеровуватися/Z|w
завертати/[|Q
завід/0z
загін/0z
загострюватися/Z|w
зазублювати/Z|w(
закочуватися/Z|w
залім/0z
заляпуватися/Z|w
занечищати/Z|w
запліт/0xz
заповідатися/[|Q
зарошувати/Z|w
заспокоювати/Z|w(
застій/0z
заторцьовуватися/Z|w
Зафар/2:{
зачахати/[|Q
заярюватися/Z|w
збій/0z
Звеничів/3@}
звіробій/0xz
звужувати/Z|w(
зенкувати/Z|w
Зінедін/2:{
зливостік/0z
Зліїв/3@}
змигувати/Z|w
Змітнів/3@}
знецінювати/Z|w(
Золочів/3@}
зубоскалити/Z|wL
Івар/2:{
ігропростір/0z
Ілів/3@}
Ільєус/2:{
інженер-майор/2:%{
ініціюватися/Z|w
інформпотік/0z
інфулат/2:%{
Ітуруп/2{
йойкатися/[|
кабелепровід/0z
кавалерист/2:%{
Кагуїв/3@}
Камден/2:{
Канів/3@}
кар'єрист/2:%{
Карабчіїв/3@}
Караченців/3@}
карфагенянин/2:8{
квантуватися/Z|w
Квасилів/3@}
Квінтиліан/2:{
Київ/3@}
Кинашів/3@}
киснепровід/0z
Китайгород/2:{
Кишинів/3@}
кіберніж/0xz
кібер-простір/0z
Кінашів/3@}
кіновечір/0z
кіногурман/2:%{
кінозахід/0z
кінь/0xz
Кірсан/2:{
Кліщів/3@}
Ключів/3@}
князь/2:%{
когнітопростір/0z
кокетувати/Z|w
Колодіїв/3@}
Колтів/3@}
Колян/2:{
конденсатопровід/0z
Конищів/3@}
конкурент/2:%{
контрактуватися/Z|w
контрзахід/0z
копірайтер/2:%{
Коптів/3@}
коренеплід/0z
Коржів/3@}
Корніїв/m3@}
Коростів/3@}
Коршів/3@}
Косенів/3@}
Костеїв/3@}
Костів/3@}
котилозавр/2:%{
Кочубіїв/3@}
Кошмалів/3@}
крамарювати/Z|w
Красіїв/3@}
криптомільйонер/2:%{
крій/0z
кросовер-твір/0z
Крутнів/3@}
Кукшин/2:{
Кулешів/3@}
культпохід/0z
Купелів/3@}
курити/ZM|w
Курів/3@}
Кхмер/2{
Ларіон/2:%{
Лемешів/3@}
Ленард/2:%{
Лешнів/3@}
Листвен/2:{
лихословити/ZL|w
Ліктів/3@}
літвечір/0z
літжурналіст/2:%{
лотік/0xz
Лошнів/3@}
луддит/2:%{
Любешів/3@}
м'якшитися/Z|w
мавр/2:%{
макогін/0xz
макросимбіонт/2:%{
Малів/3@}
маргінал/2:%{
мастилопровід/0z
Матіц/2:{
Матусів/3@}
медіа-засіб/0z
медіа-пристрій/0z
медієвіст/2:%{
Межирів/3@}
мелірувати/Z|w
мерчандайзер/2:%{
метапростір/0z
Метенів/3@}
мечохвіст/0xz7
Миклашів/3@}
Милостів/3@}
Мишів/3@}
мізантроп/2:%{
мікропристрій/0z
місяцехід/0xz
Мітчелл/2:%{
міфологізувати/Z|wO
Могилів/3@}
монотеїст/2:%{
мотопохід/0z
Мохор/2:{
мутнішати/[|Q
Нагачів/3@}
наговір/0z
наготовлювати/Z|w(
Надим/2:{
Надорожнів/3@}
надтягати/[|Q
накушувати/Z|w
нанодріт/0z
напіввідкриватися/[|Q
напівзахід/0z
напій/0z
насіннєпровід/0z
наскакуватися/Z|w
Настасів/3@}
Натанз/2:{
нафтогін/0z
нахваляти/[|Q
начіс/0z
невід/0xz
недозвіл/0z
недоорювати/Z|w
недопрем'єр/2:%{
недорозвій/0z
неофеодал/2:%{
Нечаїв/3@}
низькоділ/0z
нікопольчанин/2:8{
новоутвір/0z
Носачів/3@}
носити/ZM|wO
Нукус/2:{
обгін/0z
обдерновуватися/Z|w
облузувати/Z|w
Обмачів/3@}
обригуватися/Z|w
обціловувати/Z|w(
овід/0xz7
огнищанин/2:8{
оздоровляти/[|Q
Озліїв/3@}
окіл/0z
оливопровід/0z
Оліїв/3@}
Омар/2:{
опитуватися/Z|w
оргнабір/0z
Оржів/3@}
орфіст/2:%{
осідатися/[|Q
Остріїв/3@}
острокіл/0z
очкувати/Z|w
Ощів/3@}
Павлоград/2:{
паливопровід/0z
Парамон/2:%{
пасажиропотік/0z
патрулювати/Z|wO
пацифіст/2:%{
Пекарів/3@}
перебір/0z
перевідкладати/[|Q
Перегноїв/3@}
передпокій/0z
передруковуватися/Z|w
переконфігурувати/Z|wO
перемовлятися/[|Q
перепинатися/[|Q
перерозгортати/[|Q
перетикати/[|QZ(
перетік/0z
перкусист/2:%{
перлюструвати/Z|wO
півострів/0xz
підгноюватися/Z|w
підгородянин/2:8{
підлагоджувати/Z|w
підпресовувати/Z|w
підпростір/0z
Підсоснів/3@}
підсушувати/Z|w
піонертабір/0z
планшетист/2:%{
плентати/[|Q
пліт/0xz
Пнів/3@}
повід/0xz
погіршувати/Z|w(
Покащів/3@}
покосувати/Z|w
покрій/0z
Полікрат/2:{
Полохачів/3@}
Попелів/3@}
попирхувати/Z|w
Портленд/2:{
постригатися/[|Q
похід/0z
пошарпувати/Z|w
прелат/2:%{
пригальмовуватися/Z|w
прикордонзагін/0z
прикрапувати/Z|w
приобридати/[|Q
прислуховуватися/Z|w
присутні/~
приховувати/Z|w(
пробконіс/0xz7
провокатор/2:%{
прогинатися/[|Q
прозір/0z
проколювати/Z|w(
прополісувати/Z|w
простуджувати/Z|w(
протипотік/0z
профашист/2:%{
проштовхуватися/Z|w
Пряжів/3@}
псевдоопікун/2:%{
пульпопровід/0z
Пшемислав/2:%{
Радичів/3@}
радіотвір/0z
радянофіл/2:%{
Рашид/2:%{
ревальвувати/Z|wO
реквізитор/2:%{
Ременів/3@}
репресуватися/Z|w
рецидивіст/2:%{
Ржищів/3@}
Ровен/2:{
Рогачів/3@}
родовід/0z
Рожнів/3@}
розборонювати/Z|w
розгруповуватися/Z|w
розкіс/0z
розкозачувати/Z|w
розмазюкувати/Z|w
розплавлювати/Z|w(
розселювати/Z|w(
розтулятися/[|Q
розчиногін/0z
розщіпати/[|Q
Ролів/3@}
Руан/2:{
Рубіж/3}
Ряшів/3@}
Саїд/2:{
самозбагачуватися/Z|w
Санкт-Галлен/2:{
Сваричів/3@}
Свищів/3@}
Свідлер/2:{
світлопровід/0z
святкувати/Z|wO
Себечів/3@}
секундометрист/2:%{
Сенечів/3@}
Синюшин/2:{
сінокіс/0z
скаламучуватися/Z|w
скристалізовувати/Z|w
сліпак/2:%{
Смолдирів/3@}
сморід/0z
Снячів/3@}
совіти/[|Q
Сопачів/3@}
спецзасіб/0z
спецконсультант/2:%{
спілкуватися/Z|w
спортзахід/0z
справляти/[|Q
Старозінів/3@}
Стернер/2:{
стискатися/[|Q
Сторожів/3@}
сторонні/~
стрій/0z
стягатися/[|Q
супервинахід/0z
супердиректор/2:%{
Супрунів/3@}
табір/0z
Талас/2:{
Тасуїв/3@}
телерентгенограф/2:%{
телетвір/0z
Терешів/3@}
Тетерів/3@}
тирликати/[|Q
тихохід/0xz7
Тишів/3@}
товстолоб/2:%{
Товщів/3@}
Тугар/2:{
Туличів/3@}
Тупичів/3@}
тупіт/0z
тхір/0xz7
тюнити/Z|
Тячів/3@}
укріплятися/[|Q
Ульян/2:{
умонастрій/0z
Унів/3@}
усамітнюватися/Z|w
фальсифікувати/Z|wO
фельдшер/2:%{
фінпотік/0z
фольклорист/2:%{
Хав'єр/2:%{
Хащів/3@}
хлоропровід/0z
хлюскати/[|Q
Хмелів/3@}
Хобарт/2:{
Хорів/3@}
Хотешів/3@}
Хребтіїв/3@}
Цебрів/3@}
Ценжів/3@}
Чаниж/2:{
Черніїв/3@}
чикати/[|Q
Чугуїв/3@}
Швайнштайгер/2:{
шелихвіст/0xz7
шляхопровід/0z
Штайн/2:{
штрихуватися/Z|w
Якушів/3@}
Янез/2:{
Ясенів/3@}
